Wyoming statutes. Title 6 Crimes and Offenses
Chapter 8 Weapons

Cross references. —

For constitutional provision as to right to bear arms, see art. 1, § 24, Wyo. Const.

As to authority of peace officers to confiscate deadly weapons, see §

7-2-104

.

As to military organizations other than the national guard or troops of the United States parading with arms, see §

19-8-104

.

As to types of firearms permitted for hunting, see §§

23-3-110

,

23-3-111

.

As to prohibition against use of machine gun or silencer for hunting purposes, see §

23-3-112

.

As to prohibition against using explosives or poison to kill fish, see §

23-3-204

.

As to prohibition against firearms and explosives in state parks, see §

36-8-104

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Statutory presumption of possession of weapon by occupants of place or vehicle where it was found, 87 ALR3d 949.

Handgun manufacturer's or seller's liability for injuries caused to another by use of gun in committing crime, 44 ALR4th 595.